Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2315YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 476 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.20 School resource officer 1 grant program ââ appropriation. 2 1. The department shall develop and administer a school 3 resource officer grant program to provide grants to school 4 districts to offset the costs associated with employing, or 5 retaining the services of, one school resource officer, as 6 defined in 34 U.S.C. Â§10389, for each high school within the 7 school district. 8 2. The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 9 to administer this section, including rules relating to grant 10 application materials, eligibility requirements, and award 11 criteria. The state board is responsible for approving or 12 rejecting applications submitted by school districts pursuant 13 to this section. 14 3. Moneys awarded under this section shall be used to 15 supplement, not supplant, existing public funding used by a 16 school district for similar purposes. 17 4. A school resource officer grant program fund is 18 established in the state treasury. The fund shall be 19 administered by the department and shall consist of moneys 20 appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received 21 by the department for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the 22 fund are appropriated to the department for the school resource 23 officer grant program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys 24 in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 25 to the general fund of the state but shall remain available 26 for expenditure for the school resource officer grant program 27 for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 28 subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 29 be credited to the fund. 30 5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for each 31 succeeding fiscal year, there is appropriated from the general 32 fund of the state to the school resource officer grant program 33 fund the amount necessary to provide grants to all school 34 districts that submitted an application under this section that 35 -1- LSB 2315YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 476 was approved by the state board. 1 Sec. 2. EMERGENCY RULES. The state board of education 2 may adopt emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, 3 and section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to implement 4 the provisions of this Act and the rules shall be effective 5 immediately upon filing unless a later date is specified in the 6 rules. Any rules adopted in accordance with this section shall 7 also be published as a notice of intended action as provided 8 in section 17A.4. 9 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 10 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 11